Florida, session 2026, HB31.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Recognizing Judea
and Samaria Act."
Section 2. Section 1.016, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
1.016 Recognizing Judea and Samaria.—
(1) LEGISLATIVE INTENT.—It is the intent of the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb31-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 31 2026
Legislature to:
(a) Refer to the land liberated by Israel from Jordan
during the 1967 Six-Day War by its historical name of "Judea and
Samaria," with the land south of Jerusalem being considered
"Judea" and the land north of Jerusalem being considered
"Samaria."
(b) No longer use the term "West Bank" in official
government materials.
(2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this act, the term:
(a) "Official government material" means a guidance, rule,
material, briefing, press release, communication, or work
product document prepared by a state agency.
(b) "State agency" means every department, division,
office, board, commission, and institution of this state.
(3) PROHIBITIONS.—A state agency may not use the term
"West Bank" to refer to Judea and Samaria in an official
government material or use moneys to create an official
government material that refers to Judea and Samaria as "West
Bank."
Section 3. Instructional materials, as defined in s.
1006.28(1)(a), Florida Statutes, and library media center
collections that are adopted or acquired on or after July 1,
2026, by a district school board or charter school governing
board must refer to the land liberated by Israel from Jordan
during the 1967 Six-Day War by its historical name of "Judea and
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb31-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 31 2026
Samaria," with the land south of Jerusalem being considered
"Judea" and the land north of Jerusalem being considered
"Samaria." Such materials and collections adopted or acquired on
or after July 1, 2026, by a district school board or charter
school governing board may not use the term "West Bank" to refer
to Judea and Samaria.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb31-01-c1